Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.060

"Licensed practical nursing practice" defined—Exceptions. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

"Licensed practical nursing practice" means the performance of services requiring the knowledge, skill, and judgment necessary for carrying out selected aspects of the designated nursing regimen under the direction and supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, physician assistant, podiatric physician and surgeon, advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, or midwife.

Nothing in this section prohibits a person from practicing a profession for which a license has been issued under the laws of this state or specifically authorized by any other law of the state of Washington.

This section does not prohibit the nursing care of the sick, without compensation, by an unlicensed person who does not hold himself or herself out to be a licensed practical nurse.

[ 2020 c 80 s 16; 2012 c 13 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 406.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

PDFRCW 18.79.060

"Licensed practical nursing practice" defined—Exceptions. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

"Licensed practical nursing practice" means the performance of services requiring the knowledge, skill, and judgment necessary for carrying out selected aspects of the designated nursing regimen under the direction and supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, physician assistant, podiatric physician and surgeon, advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, or midwife.

Nothing in this section prohibits a person from practicing a profession for which a license has been issued under the laws of this state or specifically authorized by any other law of the state of Washington.

This section does not prohibit the nursing care of the sick, without compensation, by an unlicensed person who does not hold himself or herself out to be a licensed practical nurse.

[ 2024 c 239 s 4; 2020 c 80 s 16; 2012 c 13 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 406.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.